Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.010

Committee created.

There is hereby created the joint committee on energy supply, energy conservation, and energy resilience.

[ 2023 c 230 s 308; 2005 c 299 s 1; 2001 c 214 s 30; 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 13; 1969 ex.s. c 260 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.

Intent—2005 c 299: "It is the intent of the legislature to utilize lessons learned from efforts to conserve energy usage in single state buildings or complexes and extend conservation measures across all levels of government. Implementing conservation measures across all levels of government will create actual energy conservation savings, maintenance and cost savings to state and local governments, and savings to the state economy, which depends on affordable, realizable electricity to retain jobs. The legislature intends that conservation measures be identified and aggregated within a government entity or among multiple government entities to maximize energy savings and project efficiencies." [ 2005 c 299 s 3.]

Severability—Effective date—2001 c 214: See notes following RCW 80.50.010.

Findings—2001 c 214: See note following RCW 39.35.010.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 328: See note following RCW 43.21G.010.